Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1908
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 70-1901 to 70-1907 shall be construed to obligate an electric utility to enter into a power purchase agreement under a C-BED project.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 8.